Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.7661

Study and review of ambulance utilities.

The joint legislative audit and review committee shall study and review ambulance utilities established and operated by cities under chapter 482, Laws of 2005. The committee shall examine, but not be limited to, the following factors: The number and operational status of utilities established under chapter 482, Laws of 2005; whether the utility rate structures and user classifications used by cities were established in accordance with generally accepted utility rate-making practices; and rates charged by the utility to the user classifications. The committee shall provide a final report on this review by December 2007.

[ 2005 c 482 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2005 c 482: See note following RCW 35.21.766.